Utah statutes.
47-2-4.   Elimination by the county executive -- Notice of intention.

(1)  The county executive may provide for the elimination of abandoned horses in the respective counties in the following manner:

(a)  The county executive shall cause notice to be:

(i) (A)   published at least once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county; and

(B)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101, published for three weeks;

(ii)  posted in at least five public places outside of the county seat on public highways in such county; and

(iii)  posted in three public places at the county seat, one of which shall be at the front door of the courthouse.

(b)  The notices posted outside of the county seat shall be posted not less than two miles apart, and all posted notices shall be posted at least 30 days before the date which the county executive shall fix for the beginning of the elimination of abandoned horses from the range in such county as hereinafter provided.

(2)  The notice shall be substantially in the following form:

Notice is hereby given that in accordance with the provisions of law the county executive of ____ County, Utah, will proceed to eliminate abandoned horses from the open range in said county, and that beginning on __________(month\day\year), a drive will be held, and all abandoned horses running upon the open range will, under the direction and supervision of the county executive, be eliminated.  All owners of horses running upon the open range are hereby given notice to file with the county executive a description of the horses, and the brands or marks thereon.

Dated this __________(month\day\year).

By order of the county executive of  ____ County, Utah.

_______________

County Clerk.

